pl: Kształt taila deski surfingowej: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Inny
zh-TW: 衝浪板尾部形狀: 蝙蝠尾; 鑽石尾; 魚尾; 月亮尾; 尖尾; 圓尾; 方尾; 扁平尾; 燕尾; 其他
fr: Forme de l’arrière de la planche de surf: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Autre
nb: Form på surfebretthale: Flaggermus; Diamant; Fisk; Måne; Pin; Rund; Firkantet; Squash; Svale; Annet
sk-SK: Tvar zadnej časti surfovej dosky: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Iné
sv: Surfbräda – bakändens form: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Övrigt
pt-BR: Prancha de surfe formato da rabeta: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Outros
fi: Surffilaudan pyrstön muoto: Bat; Timantti; Kala; Kuu; Pin; Pyöreä; Neliö; Squash; Pääsky; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на опашката на сърф дъската: Прилеп; Диамант; Риба; Луна; Заострена (pin); Кръгла; Квадратна; Скуош; Лястовица; Друго
es: Formas de la cola de las tablas de surf: Murciélago; Diamante; Pez; Luna; Pin; Redondo; Cuadrado; Squash; Golondrina; Otro
hr-HR: Oblik repa daske za surfanje: Šišmiš; Dijamant; Riba; Mjesec; Igla; Okrugli; Kvadratni; Squash; Lastavica; Ostalo
cs: Tvar zadní části surfového prkna: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Jiné
ro-RO: Formă a cozii plăcii de surfing: Liliac; Romb; Pește; Semilună; Cui; Rotund; Pătrat; Teșit; Rândunică; Altele
tr: Sörf tahtası kuyruk şekli: Yarasa (bat); Elmas; Balık; Ay; İğne (pin); Yuvarlak; Kare; Squash; Kırlangıç; Diğer
vi: Hình dạng đuôi ván lướt sóng: Dơi; Kim cương; Cá; Mặt trăng; Ghim; Tròn; Vuông; Vuông bo góc; Đuôi nhạn; Khác
da: Halefacon for surfboard: Bat; Diamant; Fish; Moon; Pin; Rund; Firkantet; Squash; Swallow; Andet
ja: サーフボードテール形状: バット; ダイヤモンド; フィッシュ; ムーン; ピン; ラウンド; スクエア; スカッシュ; スワロー; その他
sl-SI: Oblika repa deske za surfanje: Netopir; Diamant; Riba; Luna; Pin; Okroglo; Kvadratno; Squash; Lastovka; Drugo
ru: Форма хвоста серфборда: Bat; Ромбовидная; Рыбий хвост; Полумесяц; Остроконечная (Пин); Круглая; Квадратная; Сквош; Ласточкин хвост; Другое
nl: Surfboard tailvorm: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Overig
ko: 서프보드 테일 모양: 배트; 다이아몬드; 피시; 문; 핀; 라운드; 스퀘어; 스쿼시; 스왈로우; 기타
pt-PT: Forma da cauda da prancha de surf: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Outro
en: Surfboard tail shape: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Other
it: Forma della coda della tavola da surf: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Altro
zh-CN: 冲浪板尾部形状: 蝙蝠尾; 钻石尾; 鱼尾; 月亮尾; 针尾; 圆尾; 方尾; 南瓜尾; 燕尾; 其他
th: Shapesทรงหางกระดานโต้คลื่น: ทรงค้างคาว; ทรงเพชร; ทรงหางปลา; ทรงพระจันทร์; ทรงพิน; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; ทรงสควอช; ทรงหางแฉก; อื่นๆ
hu: Szörfdeszka Shapes: Denevér; Gyémánt; Hal; Hold; Tű; Kerek; Szögletes; Squash; Fecskefarok; Egyéb
lt-LT: Banglentės uodegos forma: Šikšnosparnio (Bat); Deimanto (Diamond); Žuvies (Fish); Mėnulio (Moon); Smailus (Pin); Apvalus (Round); Kvadratinis (Square); Plokščias (Squash); Kregždės (Swallow); Kitas
el: Σχήματα ουράς σανίδας του σερφ: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Στρογγυλή; Τετράγωνη; Squash; Swallow; Άλλο
de: Form des Surfboard-Hecks: Bat; Diamond; Fish; Moon; Pin; Round; Square; Squash; Swallow; Sonstige